Maine, session 132, LD689.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Appropriates funds to the Northern New England Poison Center to ensure
continued access to 24-hour expert medical treatment advice and information on potentially
harmful substances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
Page 1 - 132LR1881(06)